Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1
TIE VOTES AND CERTIFICATES OF ELECTION

1-11-101. Tie votes at partisan elections.

If at any general or congressional vacancy election, after all recounts have been completed, any two or more pairs of joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or if two or more candidates for the offices of secretary of state, state treasurer, or attorney general tie for the highest number of votes for the same office, one of the pairs or one of the individual candidates shall be chosen by the two houses of the general assembly on a joint ballot.

If at any general or congressional vacancy election, after all recounts have been completed, any two or more persons tie for the highest number of votes for presidential electors, for United States senator, for representative in congress, for regent of the university of Colorado, for member of the state board of education, for state senator or state representative, or for district attorney, the secretary of state shall proceed to determine by lot which of the candidates shall be declared elected. Reasonable notice shall be given to the candidates of the time when the election will be determined.

If at any primary election, after all recounts have been completed, any two or more candidates for an office other than a county office of the same political party tie for the highest number of votes for the same office, the tie shall be resolved in a manner agreed upon by the tying candidates. In case the candidates fail to agree on the method of resolution within five days after the canvass is complete, the tie shall be resolved by lot to be cast as the secretary of state may determine.

If at any primary election involving a county office, after all recounts have been completed, two or more candidates of the same political party tie for the highest number of votes for the same office, the canvass board shall determine by lot the person who shall be elected. The canvass board shall provide the candidates affected by the tie vote reasonable notice of the time when the election will be determined.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 783, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 488, § 14, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) is similar to former § 1-10-104 (3)(a), and subsection (3) is similar to former § 1-10-104 (3)(b), as they existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For appointment of the original county board of canvassers, see § 1-10-101 (1)(a).

1-11-102. Tie votes in nonpartisan elections.

If any two or more candidates tie for the highest number of votes for the same office and if there are not enough offices remaining for all the candidates, the board of canvassers shall determine by lot the person who shall be elected. Reasonable notice shall be given to the candidates who are involved of the time when the election will be determined.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

1-11-102.5. Ballot issue and ballot question - majority required.

If any ballot issue or ballot question is approved by less than a majority of the votes cast, the issue or question shall be considered to have failed.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 845, § 71, effective July 1.

1-11-103. Certificates of election for nonpartisan, ballot issue, or ballot question elections.

Except in the case of offices for which a recount is required, immediately after the final abstract of votes cast for each office has been prepared and certified, the designated election official shall notify the candidates of their election to office. After any required bond and oath is filed, the designated election official shall make a formal certificate of election for each person who was elected and shall deliver the formal certificate to that person.

Except in the case of ballot issues or ballot questions for which a recount is required, immediately after the abstract of votes cast for each ballot issue or ballot question has been prepared and certified, the designated election official shall notify the governing body of the political subdivision conducting the election and the petition representatives of a ballot issue or ballot question of the election result and shall make a certificate of the votes cast for and against each ballot issue and for and against each ballot question available for public inspection in the office of the designated election official for no less than ten days following the completion of the abstract of votes cast by the canvass board.

The results of a special district election shall be certified to the division of local government within thirty days after the election as provided in section 32-1-104 (1), C.R.S. If an election is canceled, the notice and a copy of the resolution of cancellation shall be filed with the division of local government.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1435, § 118, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1174, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 489, § 15, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 452, § 10, effective August 4.

1-11-104. Certificates of election for county and precinct officers.

Except in the case of offices for which a recount is required, immediately after the final abstract of votes cast for county and precinct officers has been prepared and certified, the county clerk and recorder shall make a certificate of election, or a certificate of nomination in the case of a primary election, for each person declared to be elected or nominated to each office and shall deliver the certificates to that person.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 489, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-10-201 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-105. Certificates of election for national, state, and district officers.

Immediately after the results of an election have been certified pursuant to section 1-10-105 (1), the secretary of state shall make and transmit a certificate of election, certified under the secretary of state's seal of office, to each of the persons declared to be elected to national, state, and district offices of state concern and shall record in a book to be kept for that purpose each such certification. If the secretary of state is unable to certify the candidate elected to a state or district office of state concern, no such certification of election may be transmitted by the secretary of state until the candidate elected has been determined.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1175, § 60, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 490, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 587, § 62, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-10-202 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-106. Delivery of certified list of results.

Upon the organization of the house of representatives, the secretary of state shall deliver to the speaker of the house a certified list of candidates elected to each state office and of each member elected to the general assembly showing the member's district. If the secretary of state is unable to certify the candidate elected to state office or the member elected to the general assembly from a particular district, the secretary of state shall also deliver a list of the state offices or districts for which no certification may be made. The speaker, upon receipt of the certified list and, if delivered, the list of offices and districts for which no certification may be made and before proceeding to other business, shall open and announce the results in the presence of a majority of the members of both houses of the general assembly, who shall assemble for that purpose in the chamber of the house of representatives. The person having the highest number of votes for any of the offices shall be declared duly elected by the presiding officer of the joint assembly. The two houses on joint ballot shall then resolve any tie votes which are on the certified list of results.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 490, § 18, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-10-103 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-107. Lists of presidential electors.

The secretary of state shall prepare a certificate of election for each presidential elector who is elected at any general election. The governor shall sign and affix the seal of the state to the certificates and deliver one certificate to each elector on or before the thirty-fifth day after the general election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 785, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-10-204 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-11-108. Official abstract. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 785, § 14, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1175, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 492, § 24, effective July 1.